District of Columbia statutes.
28:9-808

Person entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

(a)

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; and “(b) The filing is necessary under this part:

(1)

To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before the applicability date; or

(2)

To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-302, § 2(s), 60 DCR 2688

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-302: Section 4 of D.C. Law 19-302 provided that the act shall apply as of July 1, 2013.